Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.330

Finding.

The legislature finds a need to provide additional work-related opportunities for nursing students. Nursing students enrolled in bachelor of science programs or associate degree programs, working within the limits of their education, gain valuable judgment and knowledge through expanded work opportunities.

[ 2003 c 258 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—2003 c 258: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2003 c 258 s 11.]

Effective date—2003 c 258: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 12, 2003]." [ 2003 c 258 s 12.]